Arkansas, session 2025, SB279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-4-218(d)(1), concerning wage and hour
investigations by the Director of the Division of Labor, is amended to read
as follows:
(d)(1) The Director of the Division of Labor shall have the authority
to fully:
(A) Fully enforce this subchapter by instituting legal
action to recover any wages that he or she determines to be due to employees
under this subchapter; and
(B)(i) Investigate all complaints filed with the Division
of Labor for unpaid wages to determine if this subchapter has been violated.
(ii) The assessment period shall be for the two (2)
*CRH185*
02/24/2025 12:08:36 PM CRH185

SB279
years preceding the filing of the complaint but may be extended through the
date the director issues a notice of assessment if the director determines a
violation of this subchapter or any other law or rule the director may
enforce hindered the director's investigation.
(iii)(a) The filing of a complaint with the director
tolls the director's statute of limitations until the entry of a final order
adjudicating the claim.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (g) of this
section, a legal action by the director to recover wages, liquidated damages,
or civil penalties shall be commenced within one (1) year of the entry of the
final order adjudicating the claim.
(iv) If a violation of this subchapter or any other
law or rule the director may enforce prevents the director from discovering a
valid claim for compensation of an employee, the employee may be joined in
the administrative proceeding at any reasonable time before the
administrative hearing or a separate notice of assessment may be issued on
behalf of the employee.



















02/24/2025 12:08:36 PM CRH185